California statutes. Education Code
(2) An existing water bottle filling station that was installed at a school before the enactment of this chapter that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (d) may be repaired or improved by a school in order to meet the requirements of subdivision (d). Upon repair or improvement of the water bottle filling station to meet the requirements of subdivision (d), the school may count the water bottle filling station toward the minimum number of water bottle filling stations required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 793, Sec. 2.   (AB 2638)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

38042.

(a) A school district or the governing body of a charter school shall allow pupils, teachers, and staff to bring and carry water bottles.

(b) Water bottles may be excluded from libraries, computer labs, science labs, and other places where it is deemed dangerous to have drinking water.

(c) School districts and governing bodies of charter schools are encouraged to develop and adopt policies about the type of water bottles that may be carried.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 793, Sec. 2.   (AB 2638)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

38043.

(a) Administrators of a school district or the governing body of a charter school shall inform teachers, staff, parents, and pupils about their rights under this chapter, including providing information in pupil and employee handbooks and making the information accessible on the internet website of the school district or charter school.

(b) Administrators of a school district or the governing body of a charter school shall encourage water consumption through promotional and educational activities and signage that focus on the benefits of drinking water and highlight water bottle filling stations throughout schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 793, Sec. 2.   (AB 2638)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Cafeterias [38080. - 38103.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment and Use [38080. - 38086.1.]

38080.

The term “cafeteria” as used in this code is considered synonymous with the term “food service.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38081.

The governing board of any school district may establish cafeterias in the schools under its jurisdiction whenever in its judgment it is advisable to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38082.

Food shall not be sold at any cafeteria operated by a school district to anyone except pupils and employees of any school district, members of the governing board thereof, and members or employees of the fund or association maintaining the cafeteria; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of the cafeteria facilities by any work or harvest camp maintained by or within the district, and by persons entitled to use the school under the Civic Center Act; and provided further, that the governing board of any school district operating a
 cafeteria may exempt by formal resolution of the board other individuals and organizations from the operation of this section including senior citizens participating in any program conducted pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500) of Division 8.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38083.

Perishable foodstuffs and seasonal commodities needed in the operation of cafeterias may be purchased by the school district in accordance with rules and regulations for such purchase adopted by the governing board of said district notwithstanding any provisions of this code in conflict with such rules and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38084.

The food served shall be sold to the patrons of the cafeterias at such a price as will pay the cost of maintaining the cafeterias, exclusive of the costs made a charge against the funds of the school district by this chapter, and items made a charge against the funds of the school district by resolution of the governing board under authority of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38086.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), by July 1, 2011, a school district shall provide access to free, fresh drinking water during meal times in the food service areas of the schools under its jurisdiction, including, but not necessarily limited to, areas where reimbursable meals under the National School Lunch Program or the federal School Breakfast Program are served or consumed. A school district may comply with this section by, among other means, providing
 cups and containers of water or soliciting or receiving donated bottled water.

(b) The governing board of a school district may adopt a resolution stating that it is unable to comply with the requirements of this section and demonstrating the reasons why it is unable to comply due to fiscal constraints or health and safety concerns. The resolution shall be publicly noticed on at least two consecutive meeting agendas, first as an information item and second as an action item, and approved by at least a majority of the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   (SB 1413)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

38086.1.

(a) The department may receive funds transferred from any available state and federal source, to be allocated by the department to school districts for the purpose of complying with the requirements of Section 38086.

(b) Subject to all laws, guidelines, policies, and criteria applicable to the funds, school districts may use funds received pursuant to subdivision (a) for water quality projects, including, but not limited to, water treatment, water facilities restructuring, water filling stations, and maintenance of water facilities.

(c) The department shall do both of the following:

(1) Consult with the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Water Resources, and the State Water Resources Control Board to identify available sources of funding, including, but not limited to, funding from Proposition 1, approved by the voters at the November 4, 2014, statewide general election, funds for safe drinking water programs administered by the department, the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Water Resources, and the State Water Resources Control Board, other state funding, and federal funding available to fund school water quality and infrastructure.

(2) Post the information collected pursuant to paragraph (1) on the department’s Internet Web site.

(d) Nothing in this section or Section 38086 affects criteria established by the State Water Resources Control Board for funds and funding programs administered by the State
 Water Resources Control Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 664, Sec. 2.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cafeterias, Funds and Accounts [38090. - 38095.]

38090.

Money received for the sale of food or for any services performed by the cafeterias may be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the “cafeteria fund” of the particular school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38091.

(a) The cafeteria fund shall be used only for those expenditures authorized by the governing board of a school district as necessary for the operation of school cafeterias, including, but not limited to, expenditures for the lease or purchase of additional cafeteria equipment for the kitchen or central food processing plant, vending machines and their installation and housing, and computer equipment and
 related software.

(b) The governing board of any school district, or of two or more school districts governed by governing boards of identical personnel, may also make expenditures from the cafeteria fund for the purchase and installation of additional preparation, cooking, or service equipment for a kitchen or central food processing plant, including necessary alterations incidental to the installation of the equipment, and for the lease or purchase of vehicles used solely in connection with the kitchen or central food processing plant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 706, Sec. 6.   (AB 626)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

38093.

The governing board of any school district may establish an account for each cafeteria established in a school of the district, or for all cafeterias established in the schools of the district, in one or more banks. The account shall be known as “The Cafeteria Account of (insert name of district) District.” If the account is established for one of several cafeterias, it shall be known as “The Cafeteria Account of the (insert name of school) School of (insert name of district) District.” All receipts of the cafeteria, or cafeterias, as the case may be, derived
 from the sale of food shall be deposited in the account and shall be expended only for the maintenance of the cafeteria, or cafeterias, exclusive of items made a charge against the funds of the school district by this chapter, and items made a charge against the funds of the school district by resolution of the governing board under authority of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38094.

The governing board of the district shall designate an employee or employees of the district to have custody of the account or accounts, who shall be responsible for the payment into the account or accounts of all moneys required to be paid into the account or accounts, and for all expenditures therefrom, subject to any regulations that the governing board prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38095.

Upon the order of the governing board of any district having a cafeteria fund in the county treasury and establishing an account, or accounts, the county treasurer shall deposit the money in the fund to the account, or accounts, and shall notify the county auditor and county or city and county superintendent of schools of his action. If the money is to be deposited in more than one account, the governing board of the district shall designate the amount to be placed in each account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cafeterias, Allocation of Charges [38100. - 38103.]

38100.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and subject to prior approval by the department, local educational agencies may make infrastructure upgrades for the operation and improvement of school meal service with state funded meal reimbursement provided for meals pursuant to Section 49501.5, as appropriated in the annual Budget Act. These costs may include, but are not limited to, cafeterias, kitchen facilities, food service and eating areas, and food storage facilities. The use of funds for
 infrastructure purposes pursuant to this section shall not be to the detriment of a local educational agency’s existing meal program.

(b) The cost of the lease or purchase of cafeteria equipment and of vending machines and their installation and housing shall be a charge against cafeteria funds, in accordance with Section 38091. However, when the governing board of a school district deems it necessary, the governing board of a school district may make the cost of the lease or purchase of cafeteria equipment for a kitchen or central food processing plant, and vending machines and their installation and housing, a charge against the funds of the school district. If school district funds are expended for the lease or purchase of kitchen
 equipment or for the lease, purchase, installation, or housing of vending machines, the governing board of the school district may at any time during the same fiscal year after the expenditure reimburse school district funds from cafeteria funds. The governing board of a school district shall only approve reimbursement for vending machines if one, or both, of the following apply:

(1) The vending machines are owned and operated by the school food services department, sell meals that qualify for federal meal program reimbursement, and are equipped with appropriate point of service meal counting software.

(2) The vending machines sell only food, or only beverages, or both that comply with state and federal competitive food laws and regulations.

(c) The governing board of a school district may by resolution make the cost of maintenance of the kitchen facilities, the cost of replacement or maintenance of kitchen equipment, and costs of telephone charges, water, drinking water in the cafeteria, electricity, gas, coal, wood, fuel, oil, and garbage disposal related to food service and delivery a charge against cafeteria funds, provided that the school district complies with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

(d) For purposes of
 this section, “cafeteria fund” means the nonprofit school food service account, as defined in Section 210.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 11.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

38101.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district may authorize expenditures from the cafeteria fund or cafeteria account for those charges from that fund or account that are defined in the California School Accounting Manual, and as specified in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) The governing board of a school district may authorize expenditures from the cafeteria fund or cafeteria account to provide meals pursuant to Section 49550.5.

(3) (A) Upon prior approval by the department, the cost of purchasing a mobile food facility, as defined in Section 113831 of the Health and Safety Code, may be a charge against the cafeteria
 fund.

(B) A local educational agency that uses federal reimbursements from any of the federal child nutrition programs to purchase a mobile food facility shall use the mobile food facility only to support the administration of those federal child nutrition programs. A mobile food facility used for any purposes other than to support the administration of federal child nutrition programs shall be purchased entirely from funding sources other than the cafeteria fund.

(b) A food service program shall not be charged more than once for expenditures for the same service. If a food service program is being charged for a service as a direct cost, the school district shall not also allocate that cost as a direct support cost or indirect cost.

(c) For purposes of this section, an “indirect cost” shall be limited to the lesser
 of the school district’s prior year indirect cost rate as approved by the department or the statewide average approved indirect cost for the second prior fiscal year.

(d) Charges to, or transfers from, a food service program shall indicate when the charge or transfer was made and shall be accompanied by a written explanation of the purpose of, and basis for, the expenditure.

(e) This section does not authorize a school district to charge a food service program any charges prohibited by state or federal law or regulation.

(f) If the department and the Department of Finance concur that a school district has violated this section, the Superintendent shall direct that school district to transfer double the amount improperly transferred to the general fund of the school district from that fund to the cafeteria fund of the
 school district or cafeteria account for the subsequent fiscal year which is then to be used for the improvement of the food service program of the school district. If the school district fails to make that transfer as directed, the Superintendent shall reduce the regular apportionment of the school district determined pursuant to Section 42238 and increase the child nutrition allowance of the school district determined pursuant to Section 41350 by double the amount improperly transferred to the general fund of the school district and that amount is then to be used for improvement of the food service program.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that responsible school district officials be held fully accountable for the accounting and reporting of food service programs and that minor and inadvertent instances of noncompliance be resolved in a fair and equitable manner to the satisfaction of the Superintendent and
 the Department of Finance.

(h) The Superintendent, with the approval of the Department of Finance, may waive up to the full transfer amount in subdivision (f) if he or she determines that the noncompliance involved is minor or inadvertent, or both.

(i) For purposes of this section, “cafeteria fund” means the nonprofit school food service account, as defined in Section 210.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 593, Sec. 2.   (AB 3043)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

38103.

The governing board of a school district shall employ persons for food service positions as part of the classified service, except that school districts may utilize the services of volunteers for programs that provide meals for senior citizens as authorized pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500) of Division 8.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Wages, salaries, and benefits, including employer retirement contributions for food service personnel, shall be paid from the general fund of the school district or from the cafeteria fund, at the
 discretion of the governing board and upon approval of the county superintendent of schools who has responsibility for a countywide payroll/retirement system under Sections 42646 and 85260. Expenses of the general fund under this section for the costs of wages, salaries, and benefits, including employer retirement contributions and other purposes classed as food service, shall be excluded from the definition of “current expense of education” as defined in Section 41372. The governing board may, at any time, order reimbursement from the cafeteria fund or account to the general fund of the district for payments under this section in such amounts as it prescribes but not to exceed food service employee salary, wage and benefit costs actually incurred.

Any reimbursements in excess of the amount actually required shall be refunded to the cafeteria fund or account not later than the close of the current fiscal year.

The
 reimbursements from the cafeteria fund or account shall be considered expenses of the cafeteria fund or account, as the case may be, and only those payments made from the general fund that are not reimbursed from the cafeteria fund or account shall be considered expenses of the general fund.

Accounting for those transactions shall be as prescribed in Section 41010.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Miscellaneous Provisions [38110. - 38139.]



  ARTICLE 1. Apparatus and Supplies [38110. - 38120.]

38110.

The county board of education shall on or before the first day of February of each year establish rules and regulations under which any school district in the county shall, except as provided in Section 40002, purchase standard school supplies and equipment through the county superintendent of schools, or when so directed by him or her, through a county purchasing agent.

When the county superintendent of schools purchases standard school supplies without directing their purchase through the county purchasing agent or
 other county, city, or school district agent or agency, he or she shall make such purchase from the lowest responsible bidder who shall give such security as the county superintendent of schools requires, or else reject all bids. For the purpose of securing bids, the county superintendent of schools shall publish at least once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county, a notice calling for bids stating where the list and specifications of standard school supplies and equipment to be furnished may be obtained and the time when, and the place where bids will be opened.

The county board of education shall list as standard school supplies and equipment such supplies and equipment as can be advantageously purchased in quantity. The list of standard school supplies shall be accompanied by a table of specifications giving the minimum grade, quality, substance, or other standard required for the purchase of each item listed.

The cost of advertising for bids and the cost of preparation of a table of specifications shall be paid from the county general fund.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to counties of the first or second class containing no more than three districts with an average daily attendance of less than 2,500.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38111.

The governing board of each school district shall, except as otherwise provided in this code, purchase school furniture, including musical instruments, and apparatus, and such other articles as are necessary for the use of schools, and may, in its discretion, purchase uniforms and other regalia for the use of school bands, orchestras and choirs, and including uniforms and equipment necessary for the use of athletic teams. The provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 4 of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall not apply to the purchase of musical instruments
 made pursuant to this section. Any such articles purchased shall always remain the property of the school district purchasing them. Only such books, apparatus, uniforms, and equipment shall be purchased by the governing board of an elementary school district, if the board is not a city board of education, as have been adopted by the county board of education having jurisdiction over the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38112.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the governing board of any school district may purchase any necessary school supplies and equipment, including standard school supplies and equipment listed by the county board of education, in the manner provided in this chapter, or the governing board of any school district may purchase such supplies and equipment directly from the vendor. Such direct purchase may be as a single district or two or more districts acting as a cooperative.

(b) An elementary school district having an average daily attendance of less than 2,500 during the preceding fiscal year may purchase standard school supplies and equipment directly from a vendor only by means of a purchasing cooperative representing a total average daily attendance in excess of 2,500 and then only if the county superintendent of schools has on file a document certifying the school district’s membership in such a cooperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38113.

The clerk of each district shall, under the direction of the board of trustees, provide all school supplies authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38114.

The cost of maintaining schoolbuses may be paid out of any funds of the district except funds derived from the sale of bonds and funds required by law to be set aside for teachers’ salaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38115.

The superintendent of schools of each county may transfer at the beginning of any school year from the funds of the school districts of the county which elect to purchase equipment and supplies in accordance with Section 38110, to the school supply revolving fund, which fund is continued in existence, a sum not to exceed 10 percent of the amount to be received during the school year by each district from the State School Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38116.

If in any county a school supply revolving fund is not established, payment for school supplies and equipment purchased through the county superintendent of schools or through the county purchasing agent shall be made by order of the governing board of the school district purchasing them, in the same manner as other payments are made from school district funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38117.

The governing board of each school district throughout the state shall provide for each schoolhouse under its control, a suitable Flag of the United States, which shall be hoisted above each schoolhouse during all school sessions and on school holidays, weather permitting.

The governing board of each school district shall provide smaller and suitable United States Flags to be displayed in each schoolroom at all times during the school sessions.

The governing board of each school
 district shall enforce this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38118.

Writing and drawing paper, pens, inks, blackboards, blackboard erasers, crayons, lead pencils, and other necessary supplies for the use of the schools, shall be furnished under direction of the governing boards of the school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38119.

The governing board of a school district may rent or lease personal property needed for district purposes, including the renting or leasing of caps and gowns for seniors who participate in high school graduation ceremonies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38120.

The governing board of any school district may lend school band instruments, music, uniforms, and other regalia to persons who are or have been, during the prior school year, members of the school band for use by them on excursions to foreign countries whether or not such an excursion is sanctioned by the governing board.

The governing board may require the borrower to make a deposit or take other measures to insure that the items borrowed will be returned in usable condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Use of School Property [38130. - 38139.]

38130.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Civic Center Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38131.

(a) There is a civic center at each and every public school facility and grounds within the state where the citizens, parent teacher associations, Camp Fire girls, Boy Scout troops, veterans’ organizations, farmers’ organizations, school-community advisory councils, senior citizens’ organizations, clubs, and associations formed for recreational, educational, political, economic, artistic, or moral activities of the public school districts may engage in supervised recreational activities, and where they may meet and discuss, from time to
 time, as they may desire, any subjects and questions that in their judgment pertain to the educational, political, economic, artistic, and moral interests of the citizens of the communities in which they reside. For purposes of this section, “veterans’ organizations” are those groups included within the definition of that term as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1800 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(b) The governing board of any school district may grant the use of school facilities or grounds as a civic center upon the terms and conditions the board deems proper, subject to the limitations, requirements, and restrictions set forth in this article, for any of the following purposes:

(1) Public, literary, scientific, recreational, educational, or public agency meetings.

(2) The discussion of matters of
 general or public interest.

(3) The conduct of religious services for temporary periods, on a one-time or renewable basis, by any church or religious organization that has no suitable meeting place for the conduct of the services, provided the governing board charges the church or religious organization using the school facilities or grounds a fee as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 38134.

(4) Child care or day care programs to provide supervision and activities for children of preschool and elementary schoolage.

(5) The administration of examinations for the selection of personnel or the instruction of precinct board members by public agencies.

(6) Supervised recreational activities including, but not limited to, sports league activities for
 youths that are arranged for and supervised by entities, including religious organizations or churches, and in which youths may participate regardless of religious belief or denomination.

(7) A community youth center.

(8) A ceremony, patriotic celebration, or related educational assembly conducted by a veterans’ organization.

(9) Other purposes deemed appropriate by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 205, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

38133.

The management, direction, and control of school facilities under this article are vested in the governing board of the school district which shall promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to provide, at a minimum, for the following:

(a) Aid, assistance, and encouragement to any of the activities authorized in Sections 38131 and 38132.

(b) Preservation of order in school facilities and on school grounds, and protection of
 school facilities and school grounds, including, if the governing board deems necessary, appointment of a person who shall have charge of the school facilities and grounds for purposes of their preservation and protection.

(c) That the use of school facilities or grounds is not inconsistent with the use of the school facilities or grounds for school purposes or interferes with the regular conduct of schoolwork.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

38134.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district shall authorize the use of school facilities or grounds under its control by a nonprofit organization, or by a club or an association organized to promote youth and school activities, including, but not necessarily limited to, any of the following:

(A) The Girl Scouts; the Boy Scouts; Camp Fire USA; or the YMCA.

(B) A parent-teacher association.

(C) A school-community advisory council.

(D) A recreational youth sports league that charges
 participants no more than a nominal fee. As used in this subparagraph, “nominal fee” means an average of no more than sixty dollars ($60) per month.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a group that uses school facilities or grounds for fundraising activities that are not beneficial to youth or public school activities of the school district, as determined by the governing board of the school district.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, a governing board of a school district may charge an amount not to exceed its direct costs for use of its school facilities or grounds pursuant to this section. A governing board of a school district that levies these charges shall first adopt a policy specifying which activities shall be charged an amount not to exceed direct
 costs.

(c) The governing board of a school district may charge an amount, not to exceed its direct costs for use of its school facilities or grounds by the entity using the school facilities or grounds, including a religious organization or church, that arranges for and supervises sports league activities for youths as described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 38131.

(d) The governing board of a school district that authorizes the use of school facilities or grounds for the purpose specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 38131 shall charge the church or religious organization an amount at least equal to the school district’s direct costs.

(e) In the case of entertainment or a meeting where an
 admission fee is charged or contributions are solicited, and the net receipts are not expended for the welfare of the pupils of the school district or for charitable purposes, a charge equal to fair rental value shall be levied for the use of the school facilities or grounds.

(f) If the use of school facilities or grounds under this section results in the destruction of school property, the entity using the school facilities or grounds may be charged for an amount necessary to repay the damages, and further use of facilities or grounds by that entity may be denied.

(g) As used in this section:

(1) “Direct costs” to the school district for the use of school facilities or grounds includes all of the following:

(A) The share of the costs of supplies, utilities, janitorial services, services of school district employees, and salaries paid to school district employees directly associated with the administration of this section to operate and maintain school facilities or grounds that is proportional to the entity’s use of the school facilities or grounds under this section.

(B) The share of the costs for maintenance, repair, restoration, and refurbishment, proportional to the use of the school facilities or grounds by the entity using the school facilities or grounds under this section as follows:

(i) For purposes of this subparagraph, “school facilities” shall be limited to only nonclassroom space, and “school grounds” shall
 include, but not necessarily be limited to, playing fields, athletic fields, track and field venues, tennis courts, and outdoor basketball courts.

(ii) The share of the cost for maintenance, repair, restoration, and refurbishment shall not apply to:

(I) Classroom-based programs that operate after school hours, including, but not necessarily limited to, after school programs, tutoring programs, or child care programs.

(II) Organizations retained by the school or school district to provide instruction or instructional activities to pupils during school hours.

(iii) Funds collected under this subparagraph shall be deposited into a special fund that shall only be
 used for purposes of this section.

(2) “Fair rental value” means the direct costs to the school district plus the amortized costs of the school facilities or grounds used for the duration of the activity authorized.

(h) (1) A school district authorizing the use of school facilities or grounds under subdivision (a) is liable for an injury resulting from the negligence of the school district in the ownership and maintenance of the school facilities or grounds. An entity using school facilities or grounds under this section is liable for an injury resulting from the negligence of that entity during the use of the school facilities or grounds. The school district and the entity using the school facilities or grounds under this section shall each bear the cost of insuring against its respective risks and shall each bear the costs of defending itself against claims arising from those risks.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, this subdivision shall not be waived. This subdivision does not limit or affect the immunity or liability of a school district under Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code for an injury caused by a dangerous condition of public property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   (AB 503)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38135.

Any use, by any individual, society, group, or organization for the commission of any act intended to further any program or movement the purpose of which is to accomplish the overthrow of the government of the United States or of the state by force, violence, or other unlawful means shall not be permitted or suffered.

Any individual, society, group, or organization which commits any act intended to further any program or movement the purpose of which is to accomplish the overthrow of the government by force, violence,
 or other unlawful means while using school property pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38136.

No governing board of a school district shall grant the use of any school property to any person or organization for any use in violation of Section 38135.

For the purpose of determining whether or not any individual, society, group, or organization applying for the use of the school property intends to violate Section 38135, the governing board shall require the making and delivery to the governing board, by the applicant of a written statement of information in the following form:

STATEMENT OF INFORMATION

The undersigned states that, to the best of his or her knowledge, the school property for use of which application is hereby made will not be used for the commission of any act intended to further any program or movement the purpose of which is to accomplish the overthrow of the government of the United States by force, violence or other unlawful means;

That ____, the organization on whose behalf he or she is making application for use of school property, does not, to the best of his or her knowledge, advocate the overthrow of the government of the United States or of the State of California by force, violence, or other unlawful means, and that, to the best of his or her knowledge, it is not a Communist action organization or Communist front organization required by law to be registered with the Attorney General of the United States. This statement is